Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.090

Limitation of liability.

Members of the board and persons acting in the authority's behalf, while acting within the scope of their employment or agency, are not subject to personal liability resulting from carrying out the powers and duties conferred on them under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 365 s 10.]